Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
PART 1
AUTHORITY OF PEACE OFFICER TO MAKE AN ARREST

16-3-101. Arrest - when and how made.

An arrest may be made on any day and at any time of the day or night.

All necessary and reasonable force may be used in making an arrest.

All necessary and reasonable force may be used to effect an entry upon any building or property or part thereof to make an authorized arrest.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 197, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-101.

16-3-102. Arrest by peace officer.

A peace officer may arrest a person when:

He has a warrant commanding that such person be arrested; or

Any crime has been or is being committed by such person in his presence; or

He has probable cause to believe that an offense was committed and has probable cause to believe that the offense was committed by the person to be arrested.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 198, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-102.

L. 77:

(1)(c) amended, p. 850, § 1, effective May 20.

16-3-103. Stopping of suspect.

A peace officer may stop any person who he reasonably suspects is committing, has committed, or is about to commit a crime and may require him to give his name and address, identification if available, and an explanation of his actions. A peace officer shall not require any person who is stopped pursuant to this section to produce or divulge such person's social security number. The stopping shall not constitute an arrest.

When a peace officer has stopped a person for questioning pursuant to this section and reasonably suspects that his personal safety requires it, he may conduct a pat-down search of that person for weapons.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 198, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-103.

L. 83:

(1) amended, p. 663, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 941, § 9, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For the stopping of persons suspected of alcohol- or drug-related traffic offenses, see § 42-4-1302.

16-3-104. Arrest by peace officer from another jurisdiction - definitions.

As used in this section:

"State" means any state of the United States and the District of Columbia;

"Peace officer" means any officer of another state having powers of arrest in that state;

"Fresh pursuit" means the pursuit without unnecessary delay of a person who has committed a crime or who is reasonably believed to have committed a crime.

Any peace officer of another state who enters this state in fresh pursuit and continues within this state in fresh pursuit of a person in order to arrest him on the ground that he has committed a crime in the other state has the same authority to arrest and hold such person in custody as a peace officer of this state has to arrest and hold a person in custody.

Except as otherwise provided by law, if an arrest is made in this state by a peace officer of another state in accordance with the provisions of this section, he shall without unnecessary delay take the person arrested before the nearest available judge of a court of record. Such judge shall conduct a hearing for the purpose of determining the lawfulness of the arrest. If the judge determines that the arrest was lawful, he shall commit the person arrested to await the time provided by law for issuance of an extradition warrant by the governor of this state, or the waiver thereof, and shall set bail if the offense is bailable under the laws of the state of Colorado. If the judge determines that the arrest was unlawful, he shall order the discharge of the person arrested.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 198, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-104.

16-3-105. Release by arresting authority.

When a person has been arrested without a warrant, he may be released by the arresting authority on its own authority if:

The arresting officer or a responsible command officer of the arresting authority is satisfied that there are no adequate grounds for criminal complaint against the person arrested; or

The offense for which the person was arrested and is being held is a misdemeanor or petty offense and the arresting officer or a responsible command officer of the arresting authority is satisfied that the person arrested will obey a summons commanding his appearance at a later date.

(1.5) No person arrested for any crime or offense, the underlying factual basis of which includes an act of domestic violence as defined in section 18-6-800.3 (1), C.R.S., shall be released at the scene of the alleged crime pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

If the person is released in accordance with subsection (1)(b) of this section, he shall be given a summons and complaint as provided for in sections 16-2-104 and 16-2-106 and shall sign a written acknowledgment of its receipt and a promise to appear at the time and place specified.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 199, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-105.

L. 94:

(1.5) added, p. 2034, § 12, effective July 1.

16-3-106. Peace officer may pursue offender.

When any peace officer is in fresh pursuit of any alleged offender, having a warrant for his arrest or having knowledge that such warrant has been issued, or, in the absence of an arrest warrant, when the offense was committed in the officer's presence or the officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the alleged offender has committed a criminal offense, and the alleged offender crosses a boundary line marking the territorial limit of his authority, such peace officer may pursue him beyond such boundary line and make the arrest, issue a summons and complaint, or issue a notice of penalty assessment.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 199, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-106.

16-3-107. Custodial care of prisoner in transit.

It is lawful for any peace officer who has the custody of any alleged offender following an arrest to pass through any counties which lie on his route between the place of arrest and the county to which he is taking the alleged offender and to lodge him in any jail on his route for safe custody for one night or more, as the occasion requires.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 199, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-107.

16-3-107.5. Transportation of prisoners - definitions.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Contracting entity" means any person or entity contracting with this state, another state, or a political subdivision of this or another state to transport a prisoner; except that "contracting entity" shall not include the department of corrections, any community corrections program operated pursuant to this title, or a county sheriff of a county located within the state of Colorado.

"Prisoner" means any person convicted of an offense in Colorado or any other state or any person under arrest for suspicion of the commission of a crime in Colorado or any other state.

"Secure facility" means a county, city and county, or municipal jail or a nonstate-owned prison facility, as defined in section 17-24-125 (1)(b), C.R.S.

"Supervising individual" means a person employed by a contracting entity to transport prisoners from one location to another.

"Transport" means to move a prisoner within, into, out of, or through the state of Colorado.

A supervising individual in each vehicle in which one or more prisoners are being transported by a contracting entity shall maintain a log book that documents for each prisoner:

His or her name, date of birth, social security number, and any prescribed medication;

The name of the jurisdictional authority authorizing the transportation, the date and time that the prisoner was first picked up, and the date and time that the prisoner was released to the jurisdictional authority;

The date, time, length, and purpose of any stop made by the vehicle transporting any prisoner; and

Information concerning any injuries suffered by the prisoner while being transported.

Upon request, a supervising individual shall surrender for inspection the log book required by paragraph (a) of this subsection (2) to any federal, state, county, or municipal law enforcement officer.

Whenever a prisoner is transported by a contracting entity, the prisoner:

At a minimum, shall be shackled and placed in a transport belt or chains with handcuffs and shall be under the observation of at least one supervising individual who shall remain awake;

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2000, p. 852, § 59, effective May 24, 2000.)

Shall not be shackled to another prisoner; and

Shall have available in the vehicle in which the prisoner is being transported appropriate attire for the season, including footwear.

(3.5) Any vehicle in which one or more prisoners are being transported by a contracting entity shall only contain as many individuals as the vehicle was designed to carry.

At least once every twenty-four hours that a prisoner is being transported by a contracting entity, the prisoner shall be housed unshackled in a cell at a secure facility for a period of not less than six hours and permitted to shower and sleep.

The contracting entity or the supervising individual shall, if practicable, notify the chief law enforcement officer in charge of the secure facility in which the prisoner is to be housed, at least twenty-four hours prior to the delivery of the prisoner to the secure facility, of each prisoner's name, date of birth, criminal history, and any special medical needs.

Whenever a vehicle transporting one or more prisoners for a contracting entity stops for more than two hours for any reason:

The supervising individual shall promptly notify, if practicable, the law enforcement agency of the local jurisdiction in which the vehicle is stopped; and

All prisoners shall be housed in a secure facility unless, according to the chief law enforcement officer of the secure facility, it would be impractical to do so.

Whenever a vehicle transporting prisoners for a contracting entity enters the state, a supervising individual shall promptly notify the Colorado bureau of investigation of the number of prisoners and the location or locations within the state where the vehicle is scheduled to stop.

Whenever a prisoner is housed in a secure facility, the contracting entity shall pay to the operator of the secure facility providing the housing the actual cost of housing the prisoner.

Any individual or entity who violates any provision of subsections (2) to (5) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars.

If any prisoner being transported escapes due to the negligence of the contracting entity or a supervising individual, the contracting entity shall be held liable for all actual costs incurred by any governmental entity in recapturing the escaped prisoner and all actual damages caused by the escaped prisoner while at large.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 699, § 1, effective May 18.

L. 2000:

(3)(b) amended and (3.5) added, p. 852, § 59, effective May 24.

16-3-108. Issuance of arrest warrant without information or complaint.

A court shall issue an arrest warrant only on affidavit sworn to or affirmed before the judge or a notary public and relating facts sufficient to establish probable cause that an offense has been committed and probable cause that a particular person committed that offense. The court shall issue a warrant for the arrest of such person commanding any peace officer to arrest the person so named and to take the person without unnecessary delay before the nearest judge of a court of record. Once a person is brought before the judge, the Colorado rules of criminal procedure are applicable.

Source:

L. 72:

R&RE, p. 199, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 39-3-108.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 463, § 3, effective July 1.

16-3-109. Peace officer - authority to make arrest while off duty.

A peace officer, as described in section 16-2.5-101, who, while off duty, is employed in a capacity specifically permitted by policies and procedures adopted by such officer's governmental entity employer shall possess the status and authority which would otherwise be afforded an on-duty peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101, acting within the course and scope of such officer's employment. To be within the scope of this section, a peace officer employed by a nongovernmental entity must be in uniform with the peace officer's public entity badge plainly visible, or such peace officer must have been approved for plain clothes work by the peace officer's governmental employer.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire section added, p. 438, § 1, effective June 3.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1776, § 36, effective June 6.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1621, § 35, effective August 6.

16-3-110. Peace officers - duties.

For the purposes of this section, "peace officer" means:

A peace officer as described in section 16-2.5-101; or

A federal law enforcement officer who, pursuant to federal statutes and the policy of the agency by which the officer is employed, is authorized to use deadly physical force in the performance of his or her duties.

A peace officer shall have the authority to act in any situation in which a felony or misdemeanor has been or is being committed in such officer's presence, and such authority shall exist regardless of whether such officer is in the jurisdiction of the law enforcement agency that employs such officer or in some other jurisdiction within the state of Colorado or whether such officer was acting within the scope of such officer's duties when he or she observed the commission of the crime, when such officer has been authorized by such agency to so act. The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction shall be immediately notified of the arrest and any person arrested shall be released to the custody of the local law enforcement agency.

This section shall not be construed to authorize any federal officer to use deadly physical force in excess of that authorized in section 18-1-707, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire section added, p. 703, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 96:

Entire section amended, p. 735, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1624, § 43, effective August 6.